Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-131
George Norris House; designated.

The George Norris home, located at 706 Norris Avenue in McCook, owned by the Nebraska State Historical Society, and legally described as all of lot 4, and the north half of lot 5, block 10, McCook first addition to the City of McCook, Red Willow County, Nebraska, is hereby designated as the George Norris House.

Laws 1986, LB 563, § 4.